Hawaii statutes.
§832-22 Fugitives from this State; duty of
governor. Whenever the governor of this State demands a person charged
with crime or with escaping from confinement or breaking the terms of the
person's bail, probation, or parole in this State, from the executive authority
of any state, or from the chief justice or an associate justice of the supreme
court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive the demand under the
laws of the United States, the governor shall issue a warrant under the great
seal of this State, to some agent, commanding the agent to receive the person
so charged if delivered to the agent and convey the person to the proper
officer of the county in this State in which the offense was committed. [L
1941, c 99, §22; RL 1945, §10652; RL 1955, §250-22; HRS §713-22; ren L 1972, c
9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next